Florida, session 2026, SB602.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSubsection (3) of section 327.75, Florida 14 Statutes, is amended to read: 15 327.75âWatercraft Energy Source Freedom Act.â 16 (3)âPROHIBITION ON RESTRICTIONS BASED ON ENERGY SOURCE.â 17 (a)âNotwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a state 18 agency, municipality, governmental entity, or county may not 19 restrict the use or sale of a watercraft based on the energy 20 source used to power the watercraft, including an energy source 21 used for propulsion or used for powering other functions of the 22 watercraft. 23 (b)âParagraph (a) does not apply to the use or sale of a 24 watercraft on any lake, reservoir, or drainage pond, or a 25 detention or retention pond, which is necessary for the 26 preservation or protection of such waters from contamination. 27 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.